Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-185
Credential; denial; refuse renewal; notice; hearing.

To deny or refuse renewal of a credential, the department shall notify the applicant or credential holder in writing of the action taken and the reasons for the determination. The denial or refusal to renew shall become final thirty days after mailing the notice unless the applicant or credential holder, within such thirty-day period, requests a hearing in writing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 49, p. 467;

C.S.1929, § 71-604;

R.S.1943, § 71-150;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 48;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 40;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 19;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 382;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-150;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 304;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 85.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

The judiciary will not interfere with executive officers in the performance of duties which are discretionary in their nature or involve the exercise of judgment; there exists no power in the courts to act upon the officer so as to interfere with the exercise of that judgment while the matter is properly before the officer for action. Roseberry v. Wright, 2 Neb. App. 248, 508 N.W.2d 867 (1993).